apertium-snd.snd.dix
    <pardef n="/ت__prn">

      <e><p><l>و</l><r>س<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يهن</l><r>ت<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--spelling doubt-->
      <e><p><l>نهن</l><r>ت<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r>س<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>ت<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ين</l><r>ت<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--spelling doubt-->

      <e><p><l>ا</l><r>س<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يهن</l><r>ت<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--spelling doubt-->
      <e><p><l>نهن</l><r>ت<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r>س<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ين</l><r>ت<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e> <!--spelling doubt-->
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>ت<s n="prn"/><s n="corel"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/ڪي__prn">

      <e><p><l>ير</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="intr"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="intr"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ير</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="intr"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ين</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="intr"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ير</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="intr"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="intr"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ير</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="intr"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ين</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="intr"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ڇا__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="intr"/><s n="in-ani"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


<!--FIXME : lt-expand *dix | grep dem ; extra ا -->

    <pardef n="اهو__prn">
<!--masc--> 
     <e><p><l>اهو</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>اِهو</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>اُهو</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اهي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اِهي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>اُهي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>انهي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>انهيءَ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>اُنهي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>اُنهيءَ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>اِنهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>انهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>اُنهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>انهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="m"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

<!--fem-->
     <e><p><l>اها</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>اِها</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e r="LR"><p><l>اُها</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اهي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>اِهي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>اُهي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ان</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>انهي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>انهيءَ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>اُنهي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>اُنهيءَ</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>اِنهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>انهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>اُنهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>انهن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/><s n="f"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>

    </pardef>

    <pardef n="منهنج/و__prn">
      <e><p><l>و</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ا</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ا</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="سند__prn">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Determiners -->


    <pardef n="منهنج/و__det"> <!-- FIXME: check paradigm for agreement patterns -->
      <e><p><l>و</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ا</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ا</l><r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Numerals -->
<!-- A cardinal number tells "how many." Cardinal numbers are also known as "counting numbers," because they show quantity. -->
<!-- Ordinal numbers tell the order of things in a set—first, second, third, etc. They only show rank or position. -->

    <pardef n="ست__num">
      <e><p><l>ون</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>و</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يون</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>يو</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="m"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ءَ</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>		<!--cardinal-->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ه</l><r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
<!--
    <pardef n="پهريون__ord">
	<e><p><l>ون</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="m"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>ي</l><r><s n="num"/><s n="ord"/><s n ="f"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="num__crd">
	<e><p><l></l><r><s n="num"/><s n="crd"/><s n ="m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
-->

    <!-- SECTION: Nouns -->

    <e lm="ت"><i></i><par n="/ت__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪ"><i>ڪ</i><par n="/ڪي__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ڇا"><i>ڇا</i><par n="ڇا__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="اه"><i></i><par n="اهو__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="منهنجو"><i>منهنج</i><par n="منهنج/و__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="توهنجو"><i>توهنج</i><par n="منهنج/و__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="پنهنجي"><i>پنهنج</i><par n="منهنج/و__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="توهانجو"><i>توهانج </i><par n="منهنج/و__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="اسانجو"><i>اسانج</i><par n="منهنج/و__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="هن جو"><i>هن ج</i><par n="منهنج/و__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ان جو"><i>ان ج</i><par n="منهنج/و__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="سندن"><i>سندن</i><par n="سند__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="سندس"><i>سندس</i><par n="سند__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="کيس"><i>کيس</i><par n="سند__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="منهنجو"><i>منهنج</i><par n="منهنج/و__det"/></e>
    <e lm="توهنجو"><i>توهنج</i><par n="منهنج/و__det"/></e>
    <e lm="پنهنجي"><i>پنهنج</i><par n="منهنج/و__det"/></e>
    <e lm="توهانجو"><i>توهانج </i><par n="منهنج/و__det"/></e>
    <e lm="اسانجو"><i>اسانج</i><par n="منهنج/و__det"/></e>
    <e lm="اسان جو"><i>اسانج</i><par n="منهنج/و__det"/></e>
    <e lm="تنهنجو"><i>تنهنج</i><par n="منهنج/و__det"/></e>
    <e lm="هن جو"><i>هن ج</i><par n="منهنج/و__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ان جو"><i>ان ج</i><par n="منهنج/و__det"/></e>
    <e lm="انهي جو"><i>انهي ج</i><par n="منهنج/و__det"/></e>
    <e lm="انهن جو"><i>انهن ج</i><par n="منهنج/و__det"/></e>
    <e lm="جنهن جو"><i>جنهن ج</i><par n="منهنج/و__det"/></e>
    <e lm="ڪهڙو"><i>ڪهڙ</i><par n="منهنج/و__det"/></e>
	<e lm="پاءُ"><i>پاءُ</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
	<e lm="پاء"><i>پاء</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
	<e lm="اڌ"><i>اڌ</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
	<e lm="ساڍا"><i>ساڍا</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
	<e lm="منو"><i>منو</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
	<e lm="مُنو"><i>مُنو</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
	<e lm="سوا"><i>سوا</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
	<e lm="ڏيڍ"><i>ڏيڍ</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
	<e lm="اڍائي"><i>اڍائي</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
	<e lm="اڍاي"><i>اڍاي</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="هڪ"><i>هڪ</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="هڪ"><i>هڪ</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="ٻ"><i>ٻ</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="ٻه"><i>ٻه</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="ٽي"><i>ٽي</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="چار"><i>چار</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="پنج"><i>پنج</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="ڇه"><i>ڇه</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="ست"><i>ست</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="اٺ"><i>اٺ</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="نو"><i>نو</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="ڏه"><i>ڏه</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="يارنهن"><i>يارنهن</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="ٻارنهن"><i>ٻارنهن</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="تيرنهن"><i>تيرنهن</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="چوڏنهن"><i>چوڏنهن</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="پندرنهن"><i>پندرنهن</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="سورنهن"><i>سورنهن</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="سترنهن"><i>سترنهن</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="ارڙنهن"><i>ارڙنهن</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="اوڻيه"><i>اوڻيه</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="ويه"><i>ويه</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="ٽيه"><i>ٽيه</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="چاليه"><i>چاليه</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="پنجاه"><i>پنجاه</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="سٺ"><i>سٺ</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="ستر"><i>ستر</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="اسي"><i>اَسي</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="نوَي"><i>نوَي</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="هزار"><i>هزار</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="هزار"><i>هزار</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="لک"><i>لک</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="ڪروڙ"><i>ڪروڙ</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="سو"><i>سو</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="سئو"><i>سئو</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="ارب"><i>ارب</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="کرب"><i>کرب</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="پهريون"><i>پهري</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="چوٿون"><i>چوٿ</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
     <e lm="ٻيون"><i>ٻي</i><par n="ست__num"/></e>
